Utah statutes.
63M-1-1805.   Annual report.

The office shall submit an annual written report to the Economic Development and Workforce Services Interim Committee describing:

(1)  its success in attracting within-the-state production of television series, made-for-television movies, and motion pictures, including feature films and independent films;

(2)  the amount of incentive commitments made by the office under this part and the period of time over which the incentives will be paid; and

(3)  the economic impact on the state related to:

(a)  dollars left in the state; and

(b)  providing motion picture incentives under this part.

